Illinois, session 104th, SB3055.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Hospital Licensing Act is amended by 5changing Section 10.8 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 85/10.8)7    Sec. 10.8. Requirements for employment of physicians. 8    (a) Physician employment by hospitals and hospital 9affiliates. Employing entities may employ physicians to 10practice medicine in all of its branches provided that the 11following requirements are met:12        (1) The employed physician is a member of the medical 13    staff of either the hospital or hospital affiliate. If a 14    hospital affiliate decides to have a medical staff, its 15    medical staff shall be organized in accordance with 16    written bylaws where the affiliate medical staff is 17    responsible for making recommendations to the governing 18    body of the affiliate regarding all quality assurance 19    activities and safeguarding professional autonomy. The 20    affiliate medical staff bylaws may not be unilaterally 21    changed by the governing body of the affiliate. Nothing in 22    this Section requires hospital affiliates to have a 23    medical staff.  SB3055- 2 -LRB104 19520 BAB 32968 b1        (2) Independent physicians, who are not employed by an 2    employing entity, periodically review the quality of the 3    medical services provided by the employed physician to 4    continuously improve patient care.5        (3) The employing entity and the employed physician 6    sign a statement acknowledging that the employer shall not 7    unreasonably exercise control, direct, or interfere with 8    the employed physician's exercise and execution of his or 9    her professional judgment in a manner that adversely 10    affects the employed physician's ability to provide 11    quality care to patients. This signed statement shall take 12    the form of a provision in the physician's employment 13    contract or a separate signed document from the employing 14    entity to the employed physician. This statement shall 15    state: "As the employer of a physician, (employer's name) 16    shall not unreasonably exercise control, direct, or 17    interfere with the employed physician's exercise and 18    execution of his or her professional judgment in a manner 19    that adversely affects the employed physician's ability to 20    provide quality care to patients."21        (4) The employing entity shall establish a mutually 22    agreed upon independent review process with criteria under 23    which an employed physician may seek review of the alleged 24    violation of this Section by physicians who are not 25    employed by the employing entity. The affiliate may 26    arrange with the hospital medical staff to conduct these   SB3055- 3 -LRB104 19520 BAB 32968 b1    reviews. The independent physicians shall make findings 2    and recommendations to the employing entity and the 3    employed physician within 30 days of the conclusion of the 4    gathering of the relevant information.5    (b) Definitions. For the purpose of this Section:6    "Employing entity" means a hospital licensed under the 7Hospital Licensing Act or a hospital affiliate.8    "Employed physician" means a physician who receives an IRS 9W-2 form, or any successor federal income tax form, from an 10employing entity.11    "Hospital" means a hospital licensed under the Hospital 12Licensing Act, except county hospitals as defined in 13subsection (c) of Section 15-1 of the Illinois Public Aid 14Code.15    "Hospital affiliate" means a corporation, partnership, 16joint venture, limited liability company, or similar 17organization, other than a hospital, that is devoted primarily 18to the provision, management, or support of health care 19services and that directly or indirectly controls, is 20controlled by, or is under common control of the hospital. 21"Control" means having at least an equal or a majority 22ownership or membership interest. A hospital affiliate shall 23be 100% owned or controlled by any combination of hospitals, 24their parent corporations, or physicians licensed to practice 25medicine in all its branches in Illinois. "Hospital affiliate" 26does not include a health maintenance organization regulated   SB3055- 4 -LRB104 19520 BAB 32968 b1under the Health Maintenance Organization Act.2    "Physician" means an individual licensed to practice 3medicine in all its branches in Illinois.4    "Professional judgment" means the exercise of a 5physician's independent clinical judgment in providing 6medically appropriate diagnoses, care, and treatment to a 7particular patient at a particular time. Situations in which 8an employing entity does not interfere with an employed 9physician's professional judgment include, without limitation, 10the following:11        (1) practice restrictions based upon peer review of 12    the physician's clinical practice to assess quality of 13    care and utilization of resources in accordance with 14    applicable bylaws;15        (2) supervision of physicians by appropriately 16    licensed medical directors, medical school faculty, 17    department chairpersons or directors, or supervising 18    physicians; and 19        (3) written statements of ethical or religious 20    directives. ; and21        (4) reasonable referral restrictions that do not, in 22    the reasonable professional judgment of the physician, 23    adversely affect the health or welfare of the patient.24    (c) Private enforcement. An employed physician aggrieved 25by a violation of this Act may seek to obtain an injunction or 26reinstatement of employment with the employing entity as the   SB3055- 5 -LRB104 19520 BAB 32968 b1court may deem appropriate. Nothing in this Section limits or 2abrogates any common law cause of action. Nothing in this 3Section shall be deemed to alter the law of negligence.4    (d) Department enforcement. The Department may enforce the 5provisions of this Section, but nothing in this Section shall 6require or permit the Department to license, certify, or 7otherwise investigate the activities of a hospital affiliate 8not otherwise required to be licensed by the Department.9    (e) Retaliation prohibited. No employing entity shall 10retaliate against any employed physician for requesting a 11hearing or review under this Section. No action may be taken 12that affects the ability of a physician to practice during 13this review, except in circumstances where the medical staff 14bylaws authorize summary suspension.15    (f) Physician collaboration. No employing entity shall 16adopt or enforce, either formally or informally, any policy, 17rule, regulation, or practice inconsistent with the provision 18of adequate collaboration, including medical direction of 19licensed advanced practice registered nurses or supervision of 20licensed physician assistants and delegation to other 21personnel under Section 54.5 of the Medical Practice Act of 221987.23    (g) Physician disciplinary actions. Nothing in this 24Section shall be construed to limit or prohibit the governing 25body of an employing entity or its medical staff, if any, from 26taking disciplinary actions against a physician as permitted   SB3055- 6 -LRB104 19520 BAB 32968 b1by law.2    (h) Physician review. Nothing in this Section shall be 3construed to prohibit a hospital or hospital affiliate from 4making a determination not to pay for a particular health care 5service or to prohibit a medical group, independent practice 6association, hospital medical staff, or hospital governing 7body from enforcing reasonable peer review or utilization 8review protocols or determining whether the employed physician 9complied with those protocols.10    (i) Review. Nothing in this Section may be used or 11construed to establish that any activity of a hospital or 12hospital affiliate is subject to review under the Illinois 13Health Facilities Planning Act.14    (j) Rules. The Department shall adopt any rules necessary 15to implement this Section.16(Source: P.A. 100-201, eff. 8-18-17; 100-513, eff. 1-1-18.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.